Maryland, session 2026, HB0084.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Criminal Procedure
6–238.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “DOMESTIC VIOLENCE” MEANS ANY OF THE FOLLOWING ACTS
COMMITTED AGAINST A VICTIM:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0084*

HOUSE BILL 84
(I) AN ACT THAT CAUSES SERIOUS BODILY HARM;
(II) AN ACT THAT PLACES THE VICTIM IN FEAR OF IMMINENT
SERIOUS BODILY HARM;
(III) ASSAULT IN ANY DEGREE;
(IV) RAPE OR SEXUAL OFFENSE UNDER § 3–303, § 3–304, §
3–307, OR § 3–308 OF THE CRIMINAL LAW ARTICLE OR ATTEMPTED RAPE OR
SEXUAL OFFENSE IN ANY DEGREE;
(V) FALSE IMPRISONMENT;
(VI) STALKING UNDER § 3–802 OF THE CRIMINAL LAW ARTICLE;
OR
(VII) REVENGE PORN UNDER § 3–809 OF THE CRIMINAL LAW
ARTICLE.
(3) “PERPETRATOR” MEANS A PERSON ALLEGED TO HAVE
COMMITTED DOMESTIC VIOLENCE.
(4) “VICTIM” MEANS:
(I) A CURRENT OR FORMER SPOUSE OF A PERPETRATOR;
(II) A COHABITANT OF A PERPETRATOR;
(III) A PERSON RELATED TO A PERPETRATOR BY BLOOD,
MARRIAGE, OR ADOPTION;
(IV) A PARENT, STEPPARENT, CHILD, OR STEPCHILD OF A
PERPETRATOR OR A PERPETRATOR’S SPOUSE OR FORMER SPOUSE WHO RESIDED
WITH THE PERPETRATOR OR SPOUSE FOR AT LEAST 90 DAYS WITHIN 1 YEAR BEFORE
THE FILING OF THE PETITION;
(V) AN INDIVIDUAL WHO HAS A CHILD IN COMMON WITH A
PERPETRATOR; OR
(VI) AN INDIVIDUAL WHO HAS HAD A SEXUAL RELATIONSHIP
WITH A PERPETRATOR WITHIN 1 YEAR BEFORE THE FILING OF THE PETITION.

HOUSE BILL 84 3
(B) THIS SECTION APPLIES TO THE FOLLOWING CRIMES:
(1) A CRIME OF VIOLENCE, AS DEFINED IN § 14–101 OF THE CRIMINAL
LAW ARTICLE, EXCEPT:
(I) MURDER UNDER § 2–201 OR § 2–204 OF THE CRIMINAL LAW
ARTICLE;
(II) A VIOLATION OF TITLE 3, SUBTITLE 3 (SEXUAL CRIMES) OF
THE CRIMINAL LAW ARTICLE; OR
(III) A VIOLATION OF TITLE 3, SUBTITLE 6 (ABUSE AND OTHER
OFFENSIVE CONDUCT) OF THE CRIMINAL LAW ARTICLE;
(2) A VIOLATION OF TITLE 5 OF THE CRIMINAL LAW ARTICLE
(CONTROLLED DANGEROUS SUBSTANCES, PRESCRIPTIONS, AND OTHER
SUBSTANCES) WHEN THE DEFENDANT WAS COMPELLED TO DISTRIBUTE,
TRANSPORT, OR POSSESS A CONTROLLED DANGEROUS SUBSTANCE ON BEHALF OF A
PERPETRATOR;
(3) A VIOLATION OF TITLE 11, SUBTITLE 3 (PROSTITUTION AND
RELATED CRIMES) OR TITLE 3, SUBTITLE 11 (HUMAN TRAFFICKING) OF THE
CRIMINAL LAW ARTICLE WHEN THE VIOLATION RESULTED FROM COERCION,
DOMINATION, OR COMPULSION BY A PERPETRATOR; AND
(4) WHEN COMMITTED IN WHOLE OR IN PART BY COERCION,
CONTROL, ECONOMIC ABUSE, OR OTHER CIRCUMSTANCES ARISING FROM DOMESTIC
VIOLENCE:
(I) A VIOLATION OF TITLE 3, SUBTITLE 7 (EXTORTION AND
OTHER THREATS) OF THE CRIMINAL LAW ARTICLE;
(II) A VIOLATION OF TITLE 6, SUBTITLE 2 (BURGLARY AND
RELATED CRIMES) OR SUBTITLE 4 (TRESPASS) OF THE CRIMINAL LAW ARTICLE;
(III) A VIOLATION OF TITLE 7 (THEFT AND RELATED CRIMES)
OF THE CRIMINAL LAW ARTICLE;
(IV) A VIOLATION OF TITLE 8, SUBTITLE 1 (BAD CHECKS),
SUBTITLE 2 (CREDIT CARD CRIMES), SUBTITLE 3 (IDENTITY FRAUD), OR SUBTITLE
6 (COUNTERFEITING AND RELATED CRIMES) OF THE CRIMINAL LAW ARTICLE; AND

HOUSE BILL 84
(V) AN ATTEMPT, CONSPIRACY, OR SOLICITATION TO COMMIT
AN OFFENSE LISTED IN ITEM (I), (II), (III), OR (IV) OF THIS ITEM.
(C) (1) EVIDENCE THAT A DEFENDANT WAS THE VICTIM OF DOMESTIC
VIOLENCE AND THAT THE DOMESTIC VIOLENCE WAS A SIGNIFICANT CONTRIBUTING
FACTOR TO THE COMMISSION OF THE CRIME OF WHICH THE DEFENDANT HAS BEEN
CONVICTED MAY BE INTRODUCED AS A MITIGATING FACTOR IN A PROSECUTION OF
AN OFFENSE LISTED IN SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION AT:
(I) SENTENCING; OR
(II) IF A MOTION TO MODIFY A SENTENCE OR REDUCE THE
DURATION OF A SENTENCE IS FILED WITHIN 5 YEARS OF THE DATE OF THE ORIGINAL
SENTENCING, AT A HEARING ON THE MOTION FOR MODIFICATION OR REDUCTION OF
THE SENTENCE.
(2) THE STATE MAY INTRODUCE EVIDENCE TO REBUT ANY EVIDENCE
OFFERED BY THE DEFENDANT UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
(D) EVIDENCE INTRODUCED UNDER SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION MAY
INCLUDE RECORDS, REPORTS, OR TESTIMONY FROM:
(1) THE DEFENDANT;
(2) THE DEFENDANT’S FAMILY MEMBERS OR FRIENDS;
(3) LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICERS;
(4) MEDICAL PROFESSIONALS;
(5) COUNSELORS, ADVOCATES, OR SOCIAL WORKERS; OR
(6) ANY OTHER SOURCE THE COURT CONSIDERS RELEVANT.
(E) THE DEFENDANT HAS THE BURDEN TO ESTABLISH, BY A
PREPONDERANCE OF THE EVIDENCE, THAT DOMESTIC VIOLENCE WAS A
SIGNIFICANT CONTRIBUTING FACTOR TO THE DEFENDANT’S COMMISSION OF THE
CRIME.
(F) (1) IF THE COURT FINDS THAT DOMESTIC VIOLENCE WAS A
SIGNIFICANT CONTRIBUTING FACTOR TO A DEFENDANT’S COMMISSION OF THE
CRIME, THE COURT SHALL:
(I) TREAT THE DOMESTIC VIOLENCE AS A MITIGATING FACTOR

HOUSE BILL 84 5
IN SENTENCING; AND
(II) CONSIDER WHETHER IT IS WARRANTED TO DEPART FROM:
1. A MANDATORY MINIMUM SENTENCE; OR
2. THE SENTENCING GUIDELINES.
(2) IF THE COURT FINDS THAT DOMESTIC VIOLENCE WAS A
SIGNIFICANT CONTRIBUTING FACTOR TO THE DEFENDANT’S COMMISSION OF THE
CRIME, THE COURT MAY IMPOSE A SENTENCE:
(I) LESS THAN THE MANDATORY MINIMUM SENTENCE
REQUIRED BY LAW;
(II) BELOW THE SENTENCING GUIDELINES; OR
(III) THAT IS OTHERWISE JUST AND APPROPRIATE IN LIGHT OF
THE CIRCUMSTANCES.
(3) THE COURT SHALL STATE ON THE RECORD THE REASONS FOR ITS
DECISION, INCLUDING WHETHER DOMESTIC VIOLENCE WAS FOUND TO BE A
MITIGATING FACTOR.
(G) NOTHING IN THIS SECTION:
(1) CREATES A SEPARATE CRIME;
(2) AUTHORIZES A COURT TO IMPOSE A SENTENCE THAT EXCEEDS
THE MAXIMUM SENTENCE PROVIDED BY LAW;
(3) ESTABLISHES A DEFENSE TO PROSECUTION;
(4) DIMINISHES THE RIGHTS OF VICTIMS OF CRIME; OR
(5) PROHIBITS A COURT FROM CONSIDERING EVIDENCE OF
DOMESTIC VIOLENCE UNDER ANY OTHER APPLICABLE PROVISION OF LAW.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.